Hawaii statutes.
[§161-12] License required. It shall
be unlawful for any person to engage in the business of slaughtering poultry or
manufacturing or processing of poultry or poultry products without a license as
required under this part. [L 1969, c 212, §8]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next